Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 3, Chapter 328, O.S.L.
2022, as last amended by Section 1, Chapter 389, O.S.L. 2025 (63
O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 427.14b), is amended to read as follows:
Section 427.14b. A. Beginning January 1, 2024, the Oklahoma
Medical Marijuana Authority shall require employees of a medical
marijuana business licensee to apply for and receive a credential
authorizing the employee to work in a licensed medical marijuana
business.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1305 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. The Authority may contract with one or more third-party
vendors to provide the credentialing services necessary to carry out
the provisions of this section.
C. The Authority shall determine the services to be provided by
such third-party vendor and shall establish costs and prices. If
contracted for credentialing services, a third-party vendor shall on
behalf of the Authority conduct the background checks and verify
eligibility for any employees of a medical marijuana business
license holder to obtain a credential.
D. Upon successful completion of the national fingerprint-based
background check conducted by the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation within thirty (30) days prior to the application,
completion of the educational training required pursuant to the
provisions of this section, and verification of eligibility for an
employee, the Authority shall issue a credential to the employee.
The applicant shall submit proof of completion of the required
educational training in the credential application, and the results
of background checks and verifications shall be provided to the
Authority by the third-party vendor.
E. Beginning January 1, 2027, in order to receive an employee
credential, all employees of a licensed medical marijuana business
shall annually complete an educational training course provided by
or approved by the Authority. The employee shall submit proof of
completion of the required educational training in order to receive
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1305 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

an e mployee credential. Such training may include an overview of
state statutes and administrative rules, patient privacy
requirements, and the safe handling and storage of medical
marijuana.
F. If the third-party vendor determines that an employee of a
medical marijuana business holder does not meet the minimum
statutory requirements for a credential, the applicant or employee
shall have no recourse against the third-party vendor but may appeal
such adverse determination to the Authority.
G. The third-party vendor shall not be civilly liable to an
applicant, licensee, or employee of a licensee for any acts taken in
good-faith compliance with the provisions of Section 420 et seq. of
this title and the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and Patient Protection
Act and the rules promulgated by the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana
Authority.
H. 1. The Authority shall review the medical marijuana
credential application; approve, reject, or deny the application;
and send the approval, rejection, or denial letter to the applicant
by the same method in which the application was submitted to the
Authority.
2. Each approved applicant shall be issued a credential, which
shall act as proof of his or her approved status, to be worn or
displayed during the hours of work of the employee. Rejection and
denial letters shall provide a reason for the rejection or denial.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1305 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Appl ications may only be rejected or denied for failure to meet the
standards set forth in the provisions of the Oklahoma Medical
Marijuana and Patient Protection Act or rules promulgated by the
Executive Director of the Authority. If an application is rejected
for failure to provide required information, the applicant shall
have thirty (30) days to submit the required information for
reconsideration. Unless the Authority determines otherwise, an
application that has been resubmitted but is still incomplete or
contains errors that are not clerical or typographical in nature
shall be denied.
I. The Authority may approve any third-party vendor meeting the
requirements of subsection J of this section to provide the
educational training course necessary to carry out the provisions of
subsection E of this section. The Authority shall have thirty (30)
days to approve or deny any vendor’s application to provide such
educational training.
J. To be approved by the Authority, the vendor shall:
1. Be an association related to the medical marijuana industry
in this state with an IRS Letter 947 determining 509(a)(2) public
charity status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended, with an effective date of exemption prior to
January 1, 2026; and
2. Provide an educational training course plan that includes an
overview of state statutes and administrative rules, patient privacy
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1305 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

requ irements, and the safe handling and storage of medical
marijuana. The educational training shall provide a minimum of one
(1) hour of in-person training for each subject addressed in the
educational training course plan.
K. The Executive Director of the Authority may promulgate rules
to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
February 12, 2026 - DO PASS












SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1305 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)